Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-193
Nebraska Brand Committee; brand publication.

The Nebraska Brand Committee shall periodically have published in book form, electronic medium, or such other method prescribed by the committee a list of all brands recorded with the brand committee at the time of such publication. Such publication may be supplemented from time to time. The publication shall contain a facsimile of all recorded brands, together with the owner's name and post office address, and shall be arranged in convenient form for reference. The brand committee shall send, without any charge, the publication as required by section 51-413 to the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse and shall provide the publication to each inspector of record and to the county sheriff of each county in the State of Nebraska, which shall be kept as a matter of public record. The publication may be sold to the general public for a price equal to or less than the actual cost of production.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 24;

Laws 2002, LB 589, § 1.